Florida, session 2026, SB1122.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 15 16 Section 1.âThe Legislature finds and declares that the 17 provision of quality and cost-efficient medical care is a public 18 necessity and that this act serves a public purpose. The 19 Legislature further finds and declares that collaborations of 20 special districts that operate as hospital districts under this 21 act benefit the residents of this state by improving access to 22 health care services, strengthening the integration of health 23 care service providers, and promoting the continuity of care 24 provided to the residents of the state, and that such 25 relationships and collaborations are vitally important to and 26 necessary for the preservation of the public health and welfare 27 of such districts, the inhabitants thereof, and the residents of 28 this state. 29 Section 2.âSubsection (7) is added to section 189.081, 30 Florida Statutes, to read: 31 189.081âActivities of special districts; local government 32 comprehensive planning.â 33 (7)(a)âTwo or more special districts that operate as 34 hospital districts may jointly enter into, participate in, 35 establish, and control any venture, partnership, corporation, 36 business entity, organization, joint operating network, service 37 line, facility, or any other joint relationship or 38 collaboration, public or private, for-profit or not-for-profit, 39 anywhere within the boundaries of either or all such special 40 districts. 41 (b)âParties that jointly enter into or participate in joint 42 relationships or collaborations with special districts pursuant 43 to paragraph (a) have state action immunity under the laws of 44 this state and the State Constitution and may exercise the 45 powers granted in paragraph (a), regardless of the purposes or 46 effect of such relationships or collaborations, or that the 47 exercise thereof may otherwise be deemed or considered to be in 48 violation of state or federal antitrust laws. 49 (c)âThis subsection shall supersede and control over any 50 general or special law that is inconsistent or in conflict with 51 this subsection. 52 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.